District of Columbia statutes.
48-302

Authority of Mayor.

Nothing in this chapter shall restrict the authority of the Mayor of the District of Columbia to inspect, condemn, denature, destroy, seize, or remove food for human consumption pursuant to § 22-2903 [repealed].

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-39, § 3, 28 DCR 3391

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-802.